Nevada, session 83, AB258-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 172.075, 172.245, 176.015,
176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156, 176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715,
178.5691, 179.495, 179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 200.3771,
200.3772, 200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392,
209.3923, 209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140,
213.010, 213.040, 213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464,
-
*AB258_R2*

– 3 –
217.475, 218A.350, 218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240,
218G.350, 224.240, 226.300, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300, 239.0105,
239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040, 239B.050,
239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270, 239C.420,
240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264, 244.335,
247.540, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130, 250.140, 250.150,
268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910, 269.174, 271A.105, 281.195,
281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680, 281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755,
281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086, 286.110, 286.118, 287.0438,
289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830, 293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503,
293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870, 293.906, 293.908, 293.910,
293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110, 332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335,
338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593, 338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420,
349.597, 349.775, 353.205, 353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100,
353C.240, 360.240, 360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242,
361.610, 365.138, 366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080,
378.290, 378.300, 379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830,
385B.100, 387.626, 387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503,
388.513, 388.750, 388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035,
391.0365, 391.120, 391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271,
392.315, 392.317, 392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045,
394.167, 394.16975, 394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465,
396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143, 396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525,
396.535, 396.9685, 398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888,
408.5484, 412.153, 414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305,
422A.342, 422A.350, 425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 432.028,
432.205, 432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407,
432B.430, 432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534,
433A.360, 439.4941, 439.4988, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 447.345, 449.209,
449.245, 449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805,
453.164, 453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555,
459.7056, 459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403,
463.3407, 463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940,
481.063, 481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340,
483.363, 483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830,
484B.833, 484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040,
534A.031, 561.285, 571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098,
598A.110, 598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303,
604A.710, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315, 616B.350,
618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137, 624.110,
624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
-
*AB258_R2*

– 4 –
628B.760, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671, 630.2672,
630.2673, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327, 630A.555, 631.332,
631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415, 632.3423, 632.405, 633.283,
633.301, 633.4715, 633.4716, 633.4717, 633.524, 634.055,
634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169, 634A.185, 635.111, 635.158,
636.262, 636.342, 637.085, 637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087,
638.089, 639.183, 639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185,
640A.220, 640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620,
640C.745, 640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340,
641.090, 641.221, 641.2215, 641.325, 641A.191, 641A.217,
641A.262, 641B.170, 641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760,
641D.260, 641D.320, 642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180,
645.625, 645A.050, 645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220,
645C.225, 645D.130, 645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330,
647.0945, 647.0947, 648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126,
652.228, 653.900, 654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130,
665.133, 669.275, 669.285, 669A.310, 671.170, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 2 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
-
*AB258_R2*

– 5 –
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 2. Chapter 239B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
governmental entity shall maintain in a confidential manner any
personal information that identifies a person as a donor, member
or volunteer of a nonprofit organization.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
governmental entity shall not:
(a) Require any person or nonprofit organization to provide
the governmental entity with personal information that identifies a
person as a donor, member or volunteer of a nonprofit
organization or otherwise compel the release of such personal
information;
(b) Release, publicize or otherwise publicly disclose personal
information in possession of the governmental entity that
-
*AB258_R2*

– 6 –
identifies a person as a donor, member or volunteer of a nonprofit
organization; or
(c) Request or require a current or prospective contractor or
grantee working with the governmental entity to provide a list of
nonprofit organizations to which the contractor or grantee has
provided financial or nonfinancial support.
3. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 do not apply to
personal information that identifies a person as a donor, member
or volunteer of a nonprofit organization that is requested,
obtained, released or disclosed as a result of the following:
(a) Any personal information required to be disclosed for the
purpose of complying with any provision of federal law;
(b) Any information, report or disclosure required to be filed
with the Secretary of State pursuant to title 7 of NRS provided
that, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any
information that directly identifies a person as a donor of
financial support to a nonprofit organization must not be collected
or disclosed;
(c) Any report or disclosure required to be filed pursuant to
chapter 294A of NRS;
(d) Any confidential information shared pursuant to
NRS 232.357;
(e) Any warrant issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(f) Any request for information in connection with discovery
proceedings if:
(1) The relevant and probative value of the information
requested outweighs its prejudicial effect; and
(2) The requester obtains a protective order from the court
barring the disclosure of such information to any person not
named in the proceedings;
(g) Any personal information voluntarily released by a person
to the governmental entity or any personal information voluntarily
released by a nonprofit organization to the public;
(h) Any personal information resulting from a donation to a
nonprofit organization that is affiliated with a governmental entity
that was disclosed to the governmental entity pursuant to state
law;
(i) Any personal information admitted as evidence before a
court of competent jurisdiction, if the court finds there is good
cause for the public release of such information;
(j) Any requests for screenings submitted by a nonprofit
organization pursuant to NRS 179A.325;
(k) Any contract, resolution or agreement entered into by a
nonprofit organization with a governmental entity, including for
purposes of obtaining a governmental benefit or grant, whereby
-
*AB258_R2*

– 7 –
the governmental entity is authorized to or any statute which
expressly authorizes a governmental entity to inspect the records
of the nonprofit organization, including, without limitation, a
contract, resolution or agreement entered into pursuant to NRS
427A.085, 433.354, 433B.220 or 439.155;
(l) Any report required to be filed by a nonprofit organization
and posted by the Department of Health and Human Services on
the Internet website maintained by the Department pursuant to
NRS 439B.665 and 439B.670;
(m) Any information required to be filed by a nonprofit
organization of surplus line brokers with the Commissioner of
Insurance pursuant to NRS 685A.075;
(n) Any information submitted to a governmental entity by a
national securities association that is registered pursuant to 15
U.S.C. § 78o-3 or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto,
including, without limitation, any information submitted to the
Secretary of State pursuant to chapters 90 and 91 of NRS and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto for the purposes of licensing,
registration, examination, investigation or enforcement;
(o) Any requirement to disclose the relationship between a
public officer or employee and a nonprofit organization pursuant
to NRS 281A.420, as a response to a lawful request or subpoena in
an investigation or as part of or in response to a request for an
advisory opinion submitted pursuant to NRS 281A.670 to
281A.690, inclusive, or an ethics complaint filed or initiated
pursuant to NRS 281A.700 to 281A.790, inclusive;
(p) Any information submitted to or requested by the Nevada
Gaming Control Board pursuant to NRS 462.160 for the purposes
of the licensing or registration of a charitable lottery or charitable
game, provided that any information collected is confidential as
provided in NRS 463.120;
(q) A request for information:
(1) Required by the Attorney General for an audit,
examination, review or investigation conducted pursuant to NRS
82.536, provided that:
(I) Such information shall only be used in connection
with the specific audit, examination, review or investigation to
which the request relates and for any related proceedings; and
(II) Such information shall otherwise remain subject to
the provisions of this section, unless expressly required by law to
be publicly disclosed;
(2) Relating to the authority to exercise the power of the
Secretary of State or the power of the Attorney General in the
areas of consumer protection pursuant to NRS 228.380, including,
without limitation, the provisions of NRS 90.615, 597.262,
-
*AB258_R2*

– 8 –
597.8198, 598C.180, 599B.015, and 599B.213 to 599B.245,
inclusive, and chapters 598, 598A and 711 of NRS, provided that
such information is otherwise subject to the requirements of this
section, unless expressly required by law to be publicly disclosed;
(3) Relating to a criminal investigation or prosecution by
the Attorney General, where there is credible evidence that a crime
has been or is being committed or for information relating to any
authorized civil investigation or inquiry undertaken by the
Attorney General, provided that any personal information
obtained in such an investigation or prosecution shall remain
confidential unless its disclosure is expressly required by law to be
publicly disclosed or is necessary to publicize in a court pleading
or submission of evidence to a court; or
(4) Connected with a constituent complaint submitted to the
Attorney General; and
(r) The names of members of a labor organization and the
amount of dues collected by a governmental entity that are
provided to the labor organization for the purposes of collecting
and reporting the remittance of dues to the labor organization
from its members, in accordance with a valid authorization to
withhold dues.
4. Any person who alleges that a governmental entity or an
officer or employee of a governmental entity has violated the
provisions of subsection 1 or 2 may bring a civil action in a court
of competent jurisdiction. If the person prevails, the person is
entitled to receive any or all of the following relief:
(a) Injunctive relief as the court deems appropriate;
(b) Costs incurred in bringing the action, including, without
limitation, reasonable attorney’s fees;
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), damages of
not less than $2,500; and
(d) If the court determines that a governmental entity or
officer or employee of a governmental entity intentionally violated
the provisions of this section, damages of not less than $7,500.
5. For the purposes of this section, personal information that
identifies a person as a donor, member or volunteer of a nonprofit
organization:
(a) Includes, without limitation, any list, record, register,
roster or other data of any kind that includes a donation, name,
address or telephone number that directly or indirectly identifies a
person as a donor of financial or nonfinancial support, member or
volunteer of any nonprofit organization; and
(b) Does not include information that identifies a person as a
staff member, employee or contractor of a nonprofit organization.
6. As used in this section:
-
*AB258_R2*

– 9 –
(a) “Governmental entity” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239.005.
(b) “Labor organization” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 288.048.
(c) “Nonprofit organization” means:
(1) An organization which qualifies as tax exempt pursuant
to section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) Any entity that has submitted an application with the
Internal Revenue Service for recognition as a tax exempt entity
pursuant to section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 3. Chapter 75 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Pursuant to section 2 of this act, in carrying out the
requirements of this title, the Secretary of State shall not collect or
disclose any information that directly identifies a person as a
donor of financial support to a nonprofit organization.
Sec. 4. NRS 82.536 is hereby amended to read as follows:
82.536 1. A corporation for public benefit and a corporation
holding assets in charitable trust is subject at all times to
examination by the Attorney General, on behalf of the State, to
ascertain the condition of its affairs and to what extent, if at all, it
fails to comply with trusts it has assumed or has departed from the
purposes for which it is formed. In case of any such a failure or
departure, the Attorney General may institute, in the name of the
State, the proceeding necessary to correct the noncompliance or
departure.
2. The Attorney General, or any person given the status of
relator by the Attorney General, may bring an action to enjoin,
correct, obtain damages for or otherwise to remedy a breach of a
charitable trust or departure from the purposes for which it is
formed.
3. Any information collected by the Attorney General
pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall only be used in connection with an audit,
examination, review or investigation by the Attorney General and
for any proceedings or action resulting from such an audit,
examination or investigation; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and section
2 of this act, is subject to the requirements of section 2 of this act,
unless expressly required by law to be publicly disclosed.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Office of the Attorney General to fund one Deputy Attorney
General position and one Compliance Investigator position the
following sums:
-
*AB258_R2*

– 10 –
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................. $202,583
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 .................................. $249,577
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 6. 1. This section and section 5 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2023.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective on
October 1, 2023.
H
-
*AB258_R2*